Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
Article 8 Office of Public Safety Support

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 716, § 3/HB 703, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that this article becomes effective only when funds are specifically appropriated for purposes of the Act, in an Appropriations Act. When funds are so appropriated, then the amendment shall become effective on the later of the date on which such appropriations Act becomes effective or the beginning date of the fiscal year for which such appropriations are made. Funds were appropriated at the 2019 session of the General Assembly. This article became effective July 1, 2019.

35-2-160.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Critical incident support services” means interventions designed to provide compassionate or coping support in the event of involvement in, being a witness to, or being otherwise affected by a traumatic event, including, but not limited to, any series of events that render a traumatic effect.

“Peer counselor” shall have the same meaning as provided for in Code Section 24-5-510.

“Public entity” means any agency or department of this state or a political subdivision or municipality of this state or an authority of this state.

“Public safety officer” means a peace officer, correctional officer, emergency health worker, firefighter, highway emergency response operator, jail officer, juvenile correctional officer, probation officer, or emergency services dispatcher.

“Support coordinator” means the coordinator of the Office of Public Safety Support within the Department of Public Safety.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-160

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 716, § 2/HB 703; Ga. L. 2020, p. 671, § 2/HB 838.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “Office of Public Safety Support” for “Office of Public Safety Officer Support” in paragraph (5).

35-2-161.
Office of Public Safety Support
established.

There is established the Office of Public Safety Support within the Department of Public Safety.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-161

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 716, § 2/HB 703; Ga. L. 2020, p. 671, § 3/HB 838.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “Office of Public Safety Support” for “Office of Public Safety Officer Support”.

35-2-162.
Support coordinator.

The support coordinator shall be appointed by and be under the direction of the commissioner. The support coordinator shall be an individual with experience as a public safety officer and who has received training and exhibited a demonstrated professional ability to provide emotional and moral support to public safety officers. The support coordinator may also otherwise serve as a public safety officer within the department. The support coordinator is charged and empowered to carry out the responsibilities provided for under this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-162

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 716, § 2/HB 703.

35-2-163.
Peer counseling and critical incident support services; certification; employment of necessary staff.

The Office of Public Safety Support within the Department of Public Safety may respond to and provide peer counselors and critical incident support services to any requesting public entities that employ public safety officers. The office may respond to and provide peer counselors and critical incident support services for the benefit of public safety officers experiencing post-traumatic stress disorder or other trauma associated with public safety. The office shall develop a course of training in critical incident stress management and in any other related subject matter for the benefit of public safety officers.

The support coordinator shall certify individuals, who shall be peer counselors, as having received training and demonstrated ability to provide emotional and moral support to public safety officers consistent with the purposes of this article.

The support coordinator, with approval of the commissioner, may employ or retain persons as he or she deems necessary to serve as peer counselors and staff consistent with the purposes of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-163

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 716, § 2/HB 703; Ga. L. 2020, p. 671, § 4/HB 838.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “Office of Public Safety Support” for “Office of Public Safety Officer Support” in the first sentence of subsection (a).

35-2-164.
Provision and designation of office space, personnel, supplies, and materials; policies and procedures.

The commissioner is authorized to provide and designate for the use of the support coordinator such space as shall be necessary to quarter the support coordinator and his or her staff. The support coordinator shall establish policies and procedures for the implementation of this article and is authorized to employ and secure the necessary staff, supplies, and materials to carry out this article, subject to the approval of the commissioner.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-164

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 716, § 2/HB 703.